Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-709.10 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this section:
1. "Abortion" means the act of using or prescribing an
instrument, a drug, a medicine, or any other substance, device, or
means with the intent to cause the death of an unborn child of a
woman known to be pregnant. An act is not an abortion if the act is
done with the intent to:
a. save the life or preserve the health of an unborn
child,
b. remove a dead, unborn child whose death was caused by
a miscarriage, or
c. remove an ectopic pregnancy;
2. "Abortion-inducing drug" means a drug, a medicine, or any
other substance, including a regimen of two or more drugs,
HB3194 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

medi cines, or substances, prescribed, dispensed, or administered
with the intent of terminating a clinically diagnosable pregnancy of
a woman and with knowledge that the termination will, with
reasonable likelihood, cause the death of the woman's unborn child.
The term includes off-label use of drugs, medicines, or other
substances known to have abortion-inducing properties that are
prescribed, dispensed, or administered with the intent of causing an
abortion, including the Mifeprex regimen, misoprostol (Cytotec), and
methotrexate. The term does not include a drug, medicine, or other
substance that may be known to cause an abortion but is prescribed,
dispensed, or administered for other medical reasons;
3. "Contraception" means the use of any natural or artificial
means to prevent the fertilization of a human ovum;
4. "Pregnancy center" means a private nonprofit organization
that promotes childbirth and alternatives to abortion and provides
women, children, and families with resources, counseling, classes,
referrals, and information related to pregnancy, childbearing,
adoption, and parenting; and
5. "Medical pregnancy center" means a private nonprofit
organization that promotes childbirth and alternatives to abortion
and provides medical testing, medical counseling, or medical care
related to pregnancy. It may also provide women, children, and
families with resources, counseling, classes, referrals, or

HB3194 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

info rmation related to pregnancy, childbearing, adoption, and
parenting.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-709.11 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State of Oklahoma and any of its state, county, city, or
municipal officials, political subdivisions, or agencies shall not,
through the adoption or enactment of any law, ordinance, policy, or
similar measure:
1. Require a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center to
offer or perform abortions;
2. Require a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center to
offer, provide, or distribute abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;
3. Require a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center to
refer for abortion, an abortion-inducing drug, or contraception;
4. Require a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center to
counsel in favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or
contraception;
5. Require a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center to
post any advertisement, sign, flyer, or similar material that
promotes abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or contraception, or
that provides any information about obtaining an abortion, abortion-
inducing drugs, or contraception;
HB3194 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

6. Prohibit a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center from
providing information, care, counseling, classes, or other services
related to pregnancy, childbirth, adoption, or parenting because the
pregnancy center does not perform, refer, or counsel in favor of
abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or contraception;
7. Prohibit a pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center from
providing pre- and post-natal resources such as diapers, baby
clothes, baby furniture, formula, and similar items because the
pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center does not perform,
refer, or counsel in favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or
contraception;
8. Prohibit a medical pregnancy center from providing medical
testing, counseling, and care related to pregnancy or childbirth
because the medical pregnancy center does not perform, refer, or
counsel in favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs, or
contraception;
9. Prohibit a medical pregnancy center from counseling a woman
on any pregnancy-related medical care or treatment, including
medical care or treatment that may counteract or reverse the effects
of abortion-inducing drugs; and
10. Interfere with the pregnancy center's or medical pregnancy
center's staffing or hiring decisions by requiring it to interview,
hire, or continue to employ any person who does not affirm the

HB3194 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

cent er's mission statement or agree to comply with the center's pro-
life ethic and operating procedures.
B. A pregnancy center or medical pregnancy center may refer a
woman to a different clinic or hospital when the woman requests
contraception.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-709.12 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A pregnancy center, medical pregnancy center, or any party
aggrieved by any violation of this act may commence a civil action
for damages, declaratory relief, injunctive relief, and any other
appropriate relief. A prevailing party shall be entitled, upon the
finding of a violation, to recover threefold his, her, or its actual
damages sustained. Recovery shall not be less than Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00), along with the costs of the action and
reasonable attorney fees. Such damages shall be cumulative and in
no way limited by any other remedies which may be available under
any other federal, state, or municipal law.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-709.13 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
It is the intent of the Legislature that every provision of this
act shall operate with equal force and shall be severable one from
the other and that, in the event that any provision of this act
HB3194 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

shal l be held invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent
jurisdiction, said provision shall be deemed severable and the
remaining provisions of this act deemed fully enforceable.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-709.14 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Legislature, by joint resolution, may appoint one or more of
its members to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which
the constitutionality or enforceability of this act is challenged.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.












HB3194 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.